Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-613
Bridges; repair; duty of county; aid by city, when.

All public bridges within a city of the first class, exceeding sixty feet in length, and the approaches thereto, over any stream crossing a county highway, shall be constructed and kept in repair by the county. When any city of the first class has constructed or repaired a bridge over sixty-feet span with approaches thereto, on any county highway within its corporate limits, and has incurred a debt for the same, then the treasurer of the county in which such bridge is located shall pay to the city treasurer seventy-five percent of all bridge taxes collected in such city until such debt and interest upon the same are fully paid. The city council may appropriate a sum not exceeding five dollars per linear foot to aid in the construction of any county bridge within the limits of such city, or may appropriate a like sum to aid in the construction of any bridge contiguous to such city on a highway leading to such bridge.

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 183;

R.S.1913, § 4912;

C.S.1922, § 4080;

C.S.1929, § 16-609;

R.S.1943, § 16-613;

Laws 1955, c. 31, § 1, p. 137;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 82.
July 21, 2016
City is required to exercise reasonable care and diligence in keeping streets and bridges in a safe condition for travel, even though they may not be frequently used by the public. City of South Omaha v. Powell, 50 Neb. 798, 70 N.W. 391 (1897).